District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1203

Deputy Recorder; effect of performance of duties.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1275, ch. 854, § 549
June 9, 1952, 66 Stat. 129, ch. 373, § 2
Aug. 3, 1954, 68 Stat. 650, ch. 653, § 3
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(uu), 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 7(b), 50 DRC 896

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-903.
1973 Ed., § 45-702.
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, Mar. 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).